Tables/Contraction/af.ctb
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the console screen (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2026 by The BRLTTY Developers.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU Lesser General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any
# later version. Please see the file LICENSE-LGPL for details.
#
# Web Page: http://brltty.app/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# BRLTTY Contraction Table - Afrikaans (contracted)
#
# Samuel Thibault <samuel.thibault@ens-lyon.org>
# 
# This table is based on the Unesco report on the progress of unification of
# braille writing « L'ÉCRITURE BRAILLE DANS LE MONDE », by Sir Clutha
# MACKENZIE: http://unesdoc.unesco.org/images/0013/001352/135251fo.pdf
# The document is dated 1954, so this table may be quite outdated.

include letters-latin.cti

always aa 2
always aan 126
always al 1246
always an 12346
always by 356
always deur 256
always die 2346
always ee 156
always ee 23
always ei 146
always el 3456
always en 26
always er 12456
always ge 123456
always ie 1456
always ig 12345
always in 35
always met 23456
always oe 246
always of 12356
always on 25
always oo 2356
always ou 1256
always sk 16
always st 34
always te 235
always ui 345
always was 346
always - 36
always , 2
always ; 23
always : 25
always ! 235
always ? 236
always / 34
always . 256
always ' 3
always " 236
always " 356
always ( 2356
always ) 2356
always * 35-35
always ^ 45
numsign 3456
capsign 6

# inline contraction of emoji descriptions
emoji af
